Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-665
Stand or standing, defined.

Stand or standing shall mean the halting of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, other than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in receiving or discharging passengers.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 161.